Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1506.06
Unconstitutional.

The Revisor of Statutes, as authorized by section 49-705, has omitted sections 77-1506.04 to 77-1506.08 which the Supreme Court has held to be unconstitutional. State ex rel. Meyer v. Peters, 191 Neb 330, 215 N.W.2d 520 (1974).